District of Columbia statutes.
3-1206.01

General authorization.

(a)

The advanced practice registered nurse may perform actions of medical diagnosis, treatment, prescription, and other functions authorized by this subchapter.

(b)

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 601, 33 DCR 729
Mar. 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-247, § 2(p), 42 DCR 457
1981 Ed., § 2-3306.1.